Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.317] AGENTS; POWER OF AUTHORITY TO FILE EVICTION ACTION. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, in an eviction action brought under this chapter, an agent may appear on behalf of a landlord that is a corporation or limited liability company. The agent must attach a copy of a power of authority form to the complaint at the time of filing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to eviction actions filed on or after that date. new text end